Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB757.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6904YC (3) 91 ss/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 99D.11, subsection 6, paragraph c, 1 subparagraphs (1) and (2), Code 2026, are amended to read as 2 follows: 3 (1) The commission shall authorize the licensee of the horse 4 racetrack located in Polk county an entity licensed pursuant to 5 section 99D.9D to conduct advance deposit wagering. An advance 6 deposit wager may be placed in person at a licensed racetrack 7 enclosure, or from any other location via a telephone-type 8 device or any other electronic means. The commission may also 9 issue an advance deposit wagering operator license to an entity 10 who complies with subparagraph (3) and section 99D.8A . 11 (2) For the purposes of this section , âadvance deposit 12 wageringâ means a method of pari-mutuel wagering in which an 13 individual may establish an account, deposit money into the 14 account, and use the account balance to pay for pari-mutuel 15 wagering. Of the net revenue, less all taxes paid and expenses 16 directly related to account deposit wagering incurred by the 17 licensee of the horse racetrack located in Polk county an 18 entity licensed pursuant to section 99D.9D , received through 19 advance deposit wagering, fifty percent shall be designated for 20 the horse purses created pursuant to section 99D.7, subsection 21 5 , and fifty percent shall be designated for the licensee for 22 the pari-mutuel horse racetrack located in Polk county. 23